Illinois, session 104th, HB3387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Secretary of State Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 305/5)  (from Ch. 124, par. 5)7    Sec. 5. It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State:8        1. To countersign and affix the seal of state to all 9    commissions required by law to be issued by the Governor.10        2. To make a register of all appointments by the 11    Governor, specifying the person appointed, the office 12    conferred, the date of the appointment, the date when bond 13    or oath is taken and the date filed. If Senate 14    confirmation is required, the date of the confirmation 15    shall be included in the register.16        3. To make proper indexes to public acts, resolutions, 17    papers and documents in the Secretary's office.18        3-a. To review all rules of all State agencies adopted 19    in compliance with the codification system prescribed by 20    the Secretary. The review shall be for the purposes and 21    include all the powers and duties provided in the Illinois 22    Administrative Procedure Act. The Secretary of State shall 23    cooperate with the Legislative Information System to   HB3387- 2 -LRB104 09830 BDA 19898 b1    insure the accuracy of the text of the rules maintained 2    under the Legislative Information System Act.3        4. To give any person requiring the same paying the 4    lawful fees therefor, a copy of any law, act, resolution, 5    record or paper in the Secretary's office, and attach 6    thereto the Secretary's certificate, under the seal of the 7    state.8        5. To take charge of and preserve from waste, and keep 9    in repair, the houses, lots, grounds and appurtenances, 10    situated in the City of Springfield, and belonging to or 11    occupied by the State, the care of which is not otherwise 12    provided for by law, and to take charge of and preserve 13    from waste, and keep in repair, the houses, lots, grounds 14    and appurtenances, situated in the State outside the City 15    of Springfield where such houses, lots, grounds and 16    appurtenances are occupied by the Secretary of State and 17    no other State officer or agency.18        6. To supervise the distribution of the laws.19        7. To perform such other duties as may be required by 20    law. The Secretary of State may, within appropriations 21    authorized by the General Assembly, maintain offices in 22    the State Capital and in such other places in the State as 23    the Secretary may deem necessary to properly carry out the 24    powers and duties vested in the Secretary by law.25        8. In addition to all other authority granted to the 26    Secretary by law, subject to appropriation, to make grants   HB3387- 3 -LRB104 09830 BDA 19898 b1    or otherwise provide assistance to, among others without 2    limitation, units of local government, school districts, 3    educational institutions, private agencies, 4    not-for-profit organizations, and for-profit entities for 5    the health, safety, and welfare of Illinois residents for 6    purposes related to education, transportation, 7    construction, capital improvements, social services, and 8    any other lawful public purpose. Upon request of the 9    Secretary, all State agencies are mandated to provide the 10    Secretary with assistance in administering the grants. 11        9. To notify the Auditor General of any Public Act 12    filed with the Office of the Secretary of State making an 13    appropriation or transfer of funds from the State 14    treasury. This paragraph (9) applies only through June 30, 15    2015. 16        10. To accept service of process only in those 17    specifically mandated areas of the law and as determined 18    by the General Assembly. The Secretary of State is not the 19    default agent for service of process in the State of 20    Illinois. 21        11. To conduct, by no later than January 1, 2027, a 22    census of the population of the State for the purpose of 23    determining the number of individuals who reside in the 24    State and the number of those individuals who are United 25    States citizens. 26(Source: P.A. 102-591, eff. 1-1-22.)   HB3387- 4 -LRB104 09830 BDA 19898 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.